Washington statutes.
RCW 35.96.010

Declaration of public interest and purpose.

It is hereby found and declared that the conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities to underground facilities is substantially beneficial to the public safety and welfare, is in the public interest and is a public purpose, notwithstanding any resulting incidental private benefit to any electric or communication utility affected by such conversion.

[ 1967 c 119 s 2.]